Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.61.020

Defrauding a public utility.

"Defrauding a public utility" means to commit, authorize, solicit, aid, abet, or attempt to:

(1) Divert, or cause to be diverted, utility services by any means whatsoever;

(2) Make, or cause to be made, a connection or reconnection with property owned or used by the utility to provide utility service without the authorization or consent of the utility;

(3) Prevent a utility meter or other device used in determining the charge for utility services from accurately performing its measuring function by tampering or by any other means;

(4) Tamper with property owned or used by the utility to provide utility services; or

(5) Use or receive the direct benefit of all or a portion of the utility service with knowledge of, or reason to believe that, the diversion, tampering, or unauthorized connection existed at the time of the use or that the use or receipt was without the authorization or consent of the utility.

[ 1989 c 109 s 2.]